Utah statutes.
48-2c-607.   Notice of series -- Articles of organization.
(1)  Notice in a company's articles of organization of the limitation on
liabilities of a series, as required by Section 48-2c-606, is sufficient
whether or not the company has established any series at the time the notice
is included in the articles of organization.
(2)  The notice required by Section 48-2c-606:
(a)  need not reference any specific series; and
(b)  for articles of organization or an amendment to articles of organization
made to include notice of series that is filed on or after May 11, 2010,
notice in a company's articles of organization is sufficient for purposes of
Subsection (1) only if the notice of series appears immediately following the
provision stating the name of the company.
(3)  The filing of the notice required by Section 48-2c-606 with the division
constitutes notice of the limitation on liability of a series.
